Utah statutes.
63C-11-202.   Commission powers and duties.

(1)  The commission shall:

(a)  purchase and use a seal;

(b)  adopt rules for the administration of this chapter in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;

(c)  prepare all forms of contracts between sponsors, licensees, promoters, and contestants; and

(d)  hold hearings relating to matters under its jurisdiction, including violations of this chapter or rules made under this chapter.

(2)  The commission may subpoena witnesses, take evidence, and require the production of books, papers, documents, records, contracts, recordings, tapes, correspondence, or other information relevant to an investigation if the commission or its designee considers it necessary.

